Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.210

Thermal energy network pilot project program—Evaluation of implementation.

The joint committee shall conduct an evaluation of the implementation of the thermal energy network pilot project program as outlined in chapter 348, Laws of 2024 and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the results of the evaluation no later than three years after June 6, 2024. The report must include an evaluation of how all pilot projects, including those that have been deployed and those that are in the process of deployment, address the considerations outlined in RCW 80.28.460 and 43.31.033.

[ 2024 c 348 s 8.]